Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 3. Relations of Partners to
Persons Dealing with
Partnership

§ 17-21-301.
Partner agent of partnership.

Subject to the effect of a statement of partnership authority pursuant to W.S.

17-21-303

:

Each partner is an agent of the partnership for the purpose of its business. Any act of a partner, including the execution of an instrument in the partnership name, for apparently carrying on in the usual way the partnership business or business of the kind carried on by the partnership binds the partnership, unless the partner has no authority to act for the partnership in the particular matter and the person with whom the partner is dealing knows or has received a notice that the partner lacks authority;

An act of a partner which is not apparently for carrying on in the usual way the partnership business or business of the kind carried on by the partnership does not bind the partnership unless authorized by the other partners.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Authority to execute lease implied. —

Partner had implied authority to execute five-year lease on building used by partnership in its clothing business, which was binding on partnership in absence of knowledge by lessor of actual limited power. Lawer v. Kline, 39 Wyo. 285, 270 P. 1077,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1928), dismissed, 41 Wyo. 167, 282 P. 1061,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1929) (decided under former § 17-13-301).

Where partner was vested with authority to sign partnership name to various instruments,

prima facie case was established against partner not signing instruments for unpaid balance of money advanced pursuant to such instruments. Universal Credit Co. v. Wyoming Motor Co., 59 Wyo. 80, 136 P.2d 512,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1943) (decided under former § 17-13-301).

Proof required that all managing partners consented. —

Where a bank, suing on a promissory note alleged to be a partnership obligation, knew that the partnership agreement required that all managing partners consent to the promissory note, the bank had the burden to prove consent by all managing partners. Evans v. Pioneer Bank of Evanston, 809 P.2d 251,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. May 6, 1991) (decided under former § 17-13-301).

No authority to sell assets of business. —

Although a partner was authorized to carry on the video rental business in the “usual way,” she did not have the authority to sell the assets of the business without the consent of her co-partner; her conduct with the buyers was not apparently for the carrying on of the business of the partnership in the usual way and, thus, her conduct did not bind the partnership since her co-partner did not authorize the partner's conduct. Wales v. Roll, 769 P.2d 899,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1989) (decided under former § 17-13-301).

Formerly, all partners had to execute chattel mortgage. —

Instrument which upon its face purported to be chattel mortgage of a firm, but was invalid as such because not executed by all firm members as required by former § 34-246, W.S. 1957, was not effective in any way. Ridgely v. First Nat. Bank, 75 F. 808,

1896 U.S. App. LEXIS 2829

(C.C.D. Wyo. 1896) (decided under former § 17-13-301).

Law of partnership applies to joint venturers and third parties. —

The substantive law of partnerships is applicable in determining the rights and liabilities of joint venturers and third parties. Wood v. Western Beef Factory, Inc., 378 F.2d 96,

1967 U.S. App. LEXIS 6314

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1967); Stone v. First Wyoming Bank N. A., 625 F.2d 332,

1980 U.S. App. LEXIS 20744

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1980) (decided under former § 17-13-301).

And joint venturer with known restricted authority cannot bind others. —

A joint venturer who acts in contravention of a restriction on his authority cannot bind the other joint venturers to persons who have knowledge of the restriction. Wood v. Western Beef Factory, Inc., 378 F.2d 96,

1967 U.S. App. LEXIS 6314

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1967); Stone v. First Wyoming Bank N. A., 625 F.2d 332,

1980 U.S. App. LEXIS 20744

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1980) (decided under former § 17-13-301).

Agreement held not to restrict joint venturer's authority. —

A provision in an agreement between two persons involved in a cattle buying and feeding venture, requiring sale through a recognized market agency, was not in fact a restriction on the authority of one of the joint venturers to receive, butcher and sell “distressed heifers” from the feed lot where the cattle were, where the provision was inserted in the agreement at the suggestion of the president of the feed lot, and its purpose was, first, to insure that the cattle sold under the agreement brought the “market” price so that the normal forces of the market would determine the cattle's value, and secondly, to hopefully enable two companies affiliated with the feed lot to get sales commissions and yardage charges when the cattle were sold. Wood v. Western Beef Factory, Inc., 378 F.2d 96,

1967 U.S. App. LEXIS 6314

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1967) (decided under former § 17-13-301).

Partnership deemed to have knowledge of partner placing machinery upon partnership property. —

Where a partner signed a contract as guarantor, for the placement of machinery upon partnership property, naming a third party as owner of property, and inspected the work being done and property being placed on the lands, to say that the partnership did not have complete knowledge of all these dealings and that the supplier dealt alone with the contracting partner and the third party was not reasonable. A partnership is not so ephemeral that it is a completely removed and detached entity from the partners or their activities or representations and can have no responsibility or notice of their acts, but is forced to live with the rule that restitution lies for services or chattels placed upon lands which benefit another with his knowledge. Horseshoe Estates v. 2M Co., 713 P.2d 776 (Wyo. 1986) (decided under former § 17-13-301).

Applied

in

Warnick v. Warnick, 2003 WY 113, 76 P.3d 316,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Provision for disposition of partner's interest on death of partner as affecting validity of contract, 1 ALR2d 1178.

Refusal of partners who do all or part of their own work to join union, or to employ union labor for the work they are doing themselves, as justification for picketing or other means of coercion employed by union, or as involving “labor dispute” within anti-injunction statute, 2 ALR2d 1196, 13 ALR2d 642.

Partner of debtor as necessary party defendant to action to set aside conveyance in fraud of creditors, 24 ALR2d 395.

Powers and duties of managing partner of mining partnership, 24 ALR2d 1359.

False pretense or allied criminal fraud by partner with respect to partnership property, 43 ALR2d 1253.

Derivative liability of partner for punitive damages for wrongful act of copartner, 14 ALR4th 1335.

Civil liability of one partner to another or to the partnership based on partner's personal purchase of partnership property during existence of partnership, 37 ALR4th 494.

§ 17-21-302.
Transfer of partnership property.

Subject to the effect of a statement of partnership authority pursuant to W.S.

17-21-303

:

Partnership property held in the name of the partnership may be transferred by an instrument of transfer executed by any partner in the partnership name;

Partnership property held in the name of one (1) or more partners with an indication in the instrument transferring the property to them of their capacity as partners or of the existence of a partnership, but without an indication of the name of the partnership, may be transferred by an instrument of transfer executed by the persons in whose name the property is held;

A partnership may recover property transferred under this subsection if it proves that execution of the instrument of transfer did not bind the partnership under W.S.

17-21-301

, unless the property was transferred by the initial transferee or a person claiming through the initial transferee to a subsequent transferee who gave value without having notice that the person who executed the instrument of initial transfer lacked authority to bind the partnership.

Partnership property held in the name of one (1) or more persons other than the partnership, without an indication in the instrument transferring the property to them of their capacity as partners or of the existence of a partnership, may be transferred free of any claims of the partnership or the partners by the persons in whose name the property is held to a transferee who gives value without having notice that it is partnership property.

If a person holds all of the partners’ interests in the partnership, all of the partnership property vests in that person. That person may execute documents in the name of the partnership to evidence vesting of the property in that person and may file or record those documents.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Trading partnerships distinguished from nontrading partnerships. —

Rule of law distinguishing trading partnerships from nontrading partnerships should be considered in determining power of single member of an association for the acquisition, sale or lease of oil properties, to dispose of association property. Rue v. Merrill, 42 Wyo. 497, 297 P. 375,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1931) (decided under former § 17-13-302).

§ 17-21-303.
Statement of partnership authority.

A partnership may file a statement of partnership authority, which:

Shall include:

The name of the partnership;

The street address of its chief executive office and of an office in this state, if any;

The names and mailing addresses of all the partners or of an agent appointed and maintained by the partnership for the purpose of subsection (b) of this section; and

A statement specifying the names of the partners authorized to execute an instrument transferring real property held in the name of the partnership.

May include a statement of the authority, or of limitations on the authority, of some or all of the partners to enter into other transactions on behalf of the partnership and any other matter.

If a statement of partnership authority names an agent, the agent shall maintain a list of the names and mailing addresses of all of the partners and make it available to any person on request for good cause shown.

If a filed statement of partnership authority is executed pursuant to W.S. 17-21-105(c) and states the name of the partnership but does not contain all of the other information required by subsection (a) of this section, the statement nevertheless operates with respect to a person not a partner as provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this section.

Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, a filed statement of partnership authority supplements the authority of a partner to enter into transactions on behalf of the partnership as follows:

Except for transfers of real property, a grant of authority contained in a filed statement of partnership authority is conclusive, in favor of a person who gives value without knowledge to the contrary, so long as and to the extent that a limitation on that authority is not then contained in another filed statement. A filed cancellation of a limitation on authority revives the previous grant of authority;

A grant of authority to transfer real property held in the name of the partnership contained in a certified copy of a filed statement of partnership authority recorded in the office for recording transfers of that real property is conclusive, in favor of a person who gives value without knowledge to the contrary, so long as and to the extent that a certified copy of a filed statement containing a limitation on that authority is not then recorded in the office for recording transfers of that real property. The recording in the office for recording transfers of that real property of a certified copy of a filed cancellation of a limitation on authority revives the previous grant of authority.

A person not a partner is deemed to know of a limitation on the authority of a partner to transfer real property held in the name of the partnership if a certified copy of the filed statement containing the limitation on authority is recorded in the office for recording transfers of that real property.

Except as provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this section and W.S.

17-21-704

and

17-21-806

, a person not a partner is not deemed to know of a limitation on the authority of a partner merely because the limitation is contained in a filed statement.

Unless earlier canceled, a filed statement of partnership authority is canceled by operation of law five (5) years after the date on which the statement or the most recent amendment was filed with the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

§ 17-21-304.
Statement of denial.

A partner or other person named as a partner in a filed statement of partnership authority or in a list maintained by an agent pursuant to W.S. 17-21-303(b) may file a statement of denial stating the name of the partnership and the fact that is being denied, which may include denial of a person’s authority or status as a partner. A statement of denial is a limitation on authority to the extent provided in W.S. 17-21-303(d) and (e).

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

§ 17-21-305.
Partnership liable for partner's actionable conduct.

A partnership is liable for loss or injury caused to a person or for a penalty incurred as a result of a wrongful act or omission or other actionable conduct of a partner acting in the ordinary course of business of the partnership or with the authority of the partnership.

If in the course of its business, a partnership receives money or property of a person not a partner which is misapplied by a partner while it is in the custody of the partnership, the partnership is liable for the loss.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Individual liability imposed for partner's fraud. —

The effect of former § 17-13-307(a)(i) (now see §

17-21-306

) was to impose individual liability against the members of a partnership when another partner committed a tortious act, including fraud, within the scope of partnership business. Bergh v. Mills, 763 P.2d 214,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1988) (decided under former § 17-3-305).

Firm not bound by act beyond ordinary scope. —

The authority of the partner necessarily depends on, and is limited by, the scope or apparent scope of the partnership business; and where the scope of the business is enlarged, the firm is not bound as to an act within the enlarged scope of the business but beyond its ordinary or usual scope. Douglas Reservoirs Water Users Ass'n v. Maurer & Garst, 398 P.2d 74,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1965) (decided under former § 17-3-306).

Even though converted property is subsequently used in the business of the partnership,

if the other partners had no actual knowledge of the unlawful origin of the property, the partnership and the innocent partners are not liable. Douglas Reservoirs Water Users Ass'n v. Maurer & Garst, 398 P.2d 74,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1965) (decided under former § 17-3-306).

But claimant may recover identifiable misapplied property from partnership. —

If misapplied property remains intact or identifiable while in the hand of the partnership, the claimant might follow the property into the hands of the partnership and recover it. Douglas Reservoirs Water Users Ass'n v. Maurer & Garst, 398 P.2d 74,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1965) (decided under former § 17-3-306).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Partner's breach of fiduciary duty to copartner on sale of partnership interest to another partner, 4 ALR4th 1122.

Derivative liability of partner for punitive damages for wrongful act of copartner, 14 ALR4th 1335.

§ 17-21-306.
Partner's liability.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, all partners are liable jointly and severally for all obligations of the partnership unless otherwise agreed by the claimant or provided by law.

Except as provided by subsections (c) and (d) of this section, a partner of a registered limited liability partnership is not liable, directly or indirectly (including by way of indemnification, contribution, assessment or otherwise), for any debts, obligations or liabilities of, or chargeable to, the registered limited liability partnership or another partner or partners, whether arising in tort, contract or otherwise, solely by reason of being such a partner or acting (or omitting to act) in such capacity or otherwise participating (as an employee, consultant, contractor or otherwise) in the conduct of the other business or activities of the registered limited liability partnership, while the partnership is a registered limited liability partnership.

Subsection (b) of this section shall not affect the liability of a partner in a registered limited liability partnership for the partner’s own negligent or wrongful act or misconduct, or that of any person under the partner’s direct supervision and control.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, all or specified partners of a registered limited liability partnership may be liable in their capacity as partners for all or specified debts, obligations or liabilities of a registered limited liability partnership to the extent at least a majority of the partners shall have agreed unless otherwise provided in any agreement between the partners. Any such agreement may be modified or revoked to the extent at least a majority of the partners shall have agreed, unless otherwise provided in any agreement between the partners, provided, however, that:

Any such modification or revocation shall not affect the liability of a partner for any debts, obligations or liabilities of a registered limited liability partnership incurred, created or assumed by the registered limited liability partnership prior to the modification or revocation; and

A partner shall be liable for debts, obligations and liabilities of the registered limited liability partnership incurred, created or assumed after such modification or revocation only in accordance with this article and, if the agreement is further modified, the agreement as so further modified but only to the extent not inconsistent with subsection (c) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall in any way affect or impair the ability of a partner to act as a guarantor or surety for, provide collateral for, or otherwise be liable for, the debts, obligations or liabilities of a registered limited liability partnership.

Subsection (b) of this section shall not affect the liability of a registered limited liability partnership out of partnership assets for partnership debts, obligations and liabilities.

A partner in a registered limited liability partnership is not a proper party to a proceeding by or against a registered limited liability partnership, the object of which is to recover any debts, obligations, or liabilities of, or chargeable to, the partnership, unless the partner is personally liable under subsection (c) or (d) of this section.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1; 1998, ch. 85, § 2.

Incidents of joint venture and partnership basically same. —

Although a joint venture is formed for a specific transaction and a partnership is ordinarily formed to carry on a continuing business, the incidents of both relations are basically the same. MJB Inv. v. Coxwell, 611 P.2d 438,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1980) (decided under former § 17-13-301).

Right of judgment creditor to reach partner's individual interest. —

Before a judgment creditor can interfere with individual interests of a partner as a member of the firm, he must show affirmatively that he has exhausted his remedy against the firm. Wild v. Stephens, 1 Wyo. 366,

1877 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1877) (decided under former § 17-13-307).

Employee receiving worker's compensation benefits cannot sue. —

An individual partner enjoys the same immunity as the partnership from a suit by an injured partnership employee who has received worker's compensation benefits through the partnership's contribution. Brebaugh v. Hales, 788 P.2d 1128,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1990) (decided under former § 17-13-307).

A partnership employee who has received worker's compensation benefits for a work-related injury may not maintain a tort action against an individual partner who manages the partnership's day-to-day operations under a contract with the partnership. The managing partner is an employer for purposes of the immunity provisions of the worker's compensation law. Pool v. Dravo Coal Co., 788 P.2d 1146,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1990) (decided under former § 17-13-307).

Applied

in

Pecha v. Smith, Keller & Assocs., 942 P.2d 387,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1997); Warnick v. Warnick, 2003 WY 113, 76 P.3d 316,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Attorney's liability for loss caused by act of associate as to money or personal property of client entrusted to the attorney, 26 ALR2d 1340.

Liability for assault by partner, 30 ALR2d 859.

Liability for injury by automobile while being used by servant for his own pleasure or business, 51 ALR2d 8, 51 ALR2d 120, 52 ALR2d 350.

Liability for negligence of intoxicated partner, 51 ALR2d 1051.

Vicarious liability of attorney for tort of partner in law firm, 70 ALR2d 1298.

Liability of partners or partnership for libel, 88 ALR2d 474.

Derivative liability of partner for punitive damages for wrongful act of copartner, 14 ALR4th 1335.

Vicarious liability of attorney for acts of associated counsel, 35 ALR5th 717.

§ 17-21-307.
Actions by and against partnership and partners.

A partnership may sue and be sued in the name of the partnership.

An action may be brought against the partnership and any or all of the partners who are personally liable for obligations of the partnership under W.S.

17-21-306

in the same action or in separate actions.

A judgment against a partnership is not by itself a judgment against a partner. A judgment against a partnership may not be satisfied from a partner’s assets unless there is a judgment against the partner.

A judgment creditor of a partner may not levy execution against the assets of a partner to satisfy a judgment based on a claim against the partnership unless:

The partner is personally liable for the liability of the partnership under W.S.

17-21-306

; and

One (1) of the following conditions is satisfied:

A judgment based on the same claim has been obtained against the partnership and a writ of execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part;

An involuntary case under title 11 of the United States Code has been commenced against the partnership and has not been dismissed within sixty (60) days after commencement or the partnership has commenced a voluntary case under title 11 of the United States Code and the case has not been dismissed;

The partner has agreed that the creditor need not exhaust partnership assets;

A court grants permission to the judgment creditor to levy execution against the assets of a partner based on a finding that partnership assets subject to execution are clearly insufficient to satisfy the judgment, that exhaustion of partnership assets is excessively burdensome or that the grant of permission is an appropriate exercise of the court’s equitable powers; or

Liability is imposed on the partner by law or contract independent of the existence of the partnership.

This section applies to any partnership liability or obligation resulting from a representation by a partner or purported partner under W.S. 17-21-308(a) or (b).

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1; 1998, ch. 85, § 2.

§ 17-21-308.
Purported partner.

If a person, by words or conduct, purports to be a partner or consents to being represented by another as a partner, in a partnership or with one (1) or more persons not partners, the purported partner is liable to a person to whom the representation is made:

If that person, relying on the representation, enters into a transaction with the actual or purported partnership; and

If the purported partner would have been personally liable for obligations of the partnership under W.S.

17-21-306

if he actually had been a partner.

Subject to subsection (a) of this section if the representation, either by the purported partner or by a person with the purported partner’s consent, is made in a public manner, the purported partner is liable to a person who relies upon the purported partnership even if the purported partner is not aware of being held out as a partner to the claimant. If partnership liability results, the purported partner is liable as if the purported partner were a partner. If no partnership liability results, the purported partner is liable jointly and severally with any other person consenting to the representation.

If a person is thus represented to be a partner in an existing partnership or with one (1) or more persons not partners, the purported partner is an agent of persons consenting to the representation to bind them to the same extent and in the same manner as if the purported partner were a partner, with respect to persons who enter into transactions in reliance upon the representation. If all the partners of the existing partnership consent to the representation, a partnership act or obligation results. If fewer than all the partners of the existing partnership consent to the representation, the person acting and the partners consenting to the representation are jointly and severally liable as provided in W.S.

17-21-306

as if the person actually had been a partner.

A person is not a partner in a partnership solely because the person is named by another in a statement of partnership authority.

A person does not continue to be a partner solely because of a failure to file a statement of dissociation or to amend a statement of partnership authority to indicate the partner’s dissociation from the partnership.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1; 1998, ch. 85, § 2.

Evidence held insufficient to show purported partner.—

Contractor’s spouse was dismissed from litigation involving the contractor’s home improvement business because there was no competent evidence to establish a genuine issue of material fact as to whether the married couple agreed to share in the profits of the business or in the management or control of the business—both of which were essential to establish partnership formation. There also was no genuine issue of material fact as to whether the spouse held the spouse as a purported partner of the business. Norris v. Besel, 2019 WY 58, 442 P.3d 60,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2019).

§ 17-21-309.
Liability of incoming partner.

A person admitted as a partner into a partnership is liable for all obligations of the partnership arising before the person’s admission as if the person had been a partner when the obligations were incurred, but this liability may be satisfied only out of partnership property.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.